Nevada, session 83, AB89.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 62B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each facility shall adopt and implement policies and
procedures concerning unclothed searches of children who are
detained in or committed to the facility. The policies and
procedures must:
(a) Prohibit an employee from conducting an unclothed search
of a child unless the employee reasonably suspects that the child
possesses or has immediate access to a weapon or contraband and
the employee has exhausted all available, less intrusive methods of
identifying any such item, including, without limitation, search
techniques that allow the child to remain fully clothed;
(b) Require the physical presence of at least two employees of
the facility for the entire duration of any unclothed search of a
child and, to the greatest extent practicable, that the employees be
of the same gender as the child; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(c) Include, without limitation, a requirement that the
employee who has primary responsibility for an unclothed search
of a child who is detained in or committed to the facility submit to
the administrator or director of the facility a written report
concerning the search.
2. A written report submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be submitted not later than 72 hours after the search
occurs; and
(b) Include a description of the search and any other
information requested by the administrator or director, as
applicable.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Facility” means a regional facility for the treatment and
rehabilitation of children or a local facility for the detention of
children.
(b) “Unclothed search” means a search that requires a person
to remove or arrange some clothing so as to permit a visual
inspection of the person’s breasts, buttocks or genitalia.
Sec. 2. Chapter 63 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The superintendent of a facility shall adopt and implement
policies and procedures concerning unclothed searches of
children who are detained in the facility. The policies and
procedures must:
(a) Prohibit an employee from conducting an unclothed search
of a child unless the employee reasonably suspects that the child
possesses or has immediate access to a weapon or contraband and
the employee has exhausted all available, less intrusive methods of
identifying any such item, including, without limitation, search
techniques that allow the child to remain fully clothed;
(b) Require the physical presence of at least two employees of
the facility for the entire duration of any unclothed search of a
child and, to the greatest extent practicable, that the employees be
of the same gender as the child; and
(c) Include, without limitation, a requirement that the
employee who has primary responsibility for an unclothed search
of a child who is detained in or committed to the facility submit to
the superintendent of the facility a written report concerning the
search.
2. A written report submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be submitted not later than 72 hours after the search
occurs; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Include a description of the search and any other
information requested by the superintendent.
3. As used in this section, “unclothed search” means a search
that requires a person to remove or arrange some clothing so as to
permit a visual inspection of the person’s breasts, buttocks or
genitalia.
Sec. 3. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 and 2 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)